Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 4. Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact
Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule.

The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision shall take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.

Section 11 Oversight, Dispute Resolution, and Enforcement

Dispute Resolution:

Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among member states and between member and non-member states;

The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.

Enforcement:

The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this Compact;

By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees;

The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.

Section 12 Date of Implementation of the Interstate Commission for Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice and Associated Rules, Withdrawal, and Amendment

The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the Commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and administration of the Compact.

Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that state.

Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing the same subject to the following:

A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute;

Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s audiology or speech-language pathology licensing board to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any audiology or speech-language pathology licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.

This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.

Section 13 Construction and Severability

This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any member state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any member state, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.

Section 14 Binding Effect of Compact and Other Laws

Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.

All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

All lawful actions of the Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the member states.

All agreements between the Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 128, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.